morphology_project/icelandic.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+N
	+Def
	+Nom+Sg
	+Acc+Sg
	+Dat+Sg
	+Gen+Sg
	+Nom+Pl
	+Acc+Pl
	+Dat+Pl
	+Gen+Pl
	@P.WEAK.AR@
	@R.WEAK.AR@
	@P.WEAK.UR@
	@R.WEAK.UR@
	@P.MASC.UR1@
	@P.MASC.UR2@
	@P.MASC.UR3@
	@R.MASC.UR1@
	@D.MASC.UR1@
	@R.MASC.UR3@
	@D.MASC.UR3@
	
LEXICON Root
 	NounStems ;

LEXICON NounStems
@P.MASC.UR1@hestur:@P.MASC.UR1@hest	MasculineUr ;	
@P.MASC.UR2@dalur:@P.MASC.UR2@dal 	MasculineUr ;
@P.MASC.UR3@staður:@P.MASC.UR3@stað	MasculineUr ;
lykill:lykil				MasculineL ;
jökull:jökul				MasculineL ;
hellir:hell				MasculineR ;
læknir:lækn				MasculineR ;
fleinn:flein				MasculineN ;
steinn:stein				MasculineN ;
fugl:fugl				Masculine0 ;
@P.WEAK.AR@pabbi:@P.WEAK.AR@pabb	MasculineWeak ;
@P.WEAK.AR@ái:@P.WEAK.AR@á		MasculineWeak ;
@P.WEAK.UR@bóndi:@P.WEAK.UR@bónd	MasculineWeak ;
@P.WEAK.UR@búandi:@P.WEAK.UR@búand	MasculineWeak ;
borg:borg				FeminineIr ;
mynd:mynd				FeminineIr ;
mey:mey					FeminineAr ;
skál:skál				FeminineAr ;
bók:bók					FeminineUr ;
grind:grind				FeminineUr ;
@P.WEAK.UR@júkka:@P.WEAK.UR@júkk	FeminineWeak ;
@P.WEAK.UR@stofa:@P.WEAK.UR@stof	FeminineWeak ;
@P.WEAK.AR@heiði:@P.WEAK.AR@heið	FeminineWeak ;
blóm:blóm				NeuterStrong ;
glas:glas				NeuterStrong ;
auga:aug				NeuterWeak ;
eyra:eyr				NeuterWeak ;

LEXICON MasculineR 
:^ MascCaseR ;

LEXICON MasculineN
:^ MascCaseN ;

LEXICON Masculine0
:^ MascCase0 ;

LEXICON MasculineL 
:^	MascCaseL ;

LEXICON MasculineWeak 
:^	MascCaseWeak ;

LEXICON MasculineUr 
:^	MascCaseUr ;

LEXICON NeuterWeak
:^ NeuterCaseWeak ;

LEXICON NeuterStrong 
:^	NeuterCaseStrong ;

LEXICON FeminineWeak
:^	FemCaseWeak ;

LEXICON FeminineUr
:^	FemCaseUr ;

LEXICON FeminineAr
:^	FemCaseAr ;

LEXICON FeminineIr
:^	FemCaseIr ;

LEXICON NeuterCaseStrong
+Nom+Sg:0       NeuterDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:0       NeuterDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:i       NeuterDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:s       NeuterDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:0      NeuterDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:0       NeuterDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      NeuterDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       NeuterDefGenPl ;

LEXICON NeuterCaseWeak
+Nom+Sg:a       NeuterDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:a       NeuterDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:a       NeuterDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:a       NeuterDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:u      NeuterDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:u       NeuterDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      NeuterDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:na       NeuterDefGenPl ;

LEXICON FemCaseWeak
@R.WEAK.UR@+Nom+Sg:@R.WEAK.UR@a       	FemDefNomSg ;
@R.WEAK.UR@+Acc+Sg:@R.WEAK.UR@u       	FemDefAccSg ;
@R.WEAK.UR@+Dat+Sg:@R.WEAK.UR@u       	FemDefDatSg ;
@R.WEAK.UR@+Gen+Sg:@R.WEAK.UR@u       	FemDefGenSg ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Nom+Sg:@R.WEAK.AR@i		FemDefNomSg ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Acc+Sg:@R.WEAK.AR@i 	FemDefAccSg ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Dat+Sg:@R.WEAK.AR@i 	FemDefDatSg ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Gen+Sg:@R.WEAK.AR@ar 	FemDefGenSg ;  

@R.WEAK.UR@+Nom+Pl:@R.WEAK.UR@ur      	FemDefNomPl ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Nom+Pl:@R.WEAK.AR@ar	FemDefNomPl ;
@R.WEAK.UR@+Acc+Pl:@R.WEAK.UR@ur       	FemDefAccPl ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Acc+Pl:@R.WEAK.AR@ar	FemDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      FemDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       FemDefGenPl ;

LEXICON FemCaseUr
+Nom+Sg:       FemDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:       FemDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:       FemDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:ar       FemDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ur      FemDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:ur       FemDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      FemDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       FemDefGenPl ;

LEXICON FemCaseAr
+Nom+Sg:       FemDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:       FemDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:       FemDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:ar       FemDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ar      FemDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:ar       FemDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      FemDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       FemDefGenPl ;

LEXICON FemCaseIr
+Nom+Sg:       FemDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:       FemDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:       FemDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:ar       FemDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ir      FemDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:ir       FemDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      FemDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       FemDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascCaseWeak
+Nom+Sg:i       			MascDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:a       			MascDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:a       			MascDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:a       			MascDefGenSg ;

@R.WEAK.AR@+Nom+Pl:@R.WEAK.AR@ar      	MascDefNomPl ;
@R.WEAK.UR@+Nom+Pl:@R.WEAK.UR@ur	MascDefNomPl ;
@R.WEAK.UR@+Acc+Pl:@R.WEAK.UR@ur	MascDefAccPl ;
@R.WEAK.AR@+Acc+Pl:@R.WEAK.AR@a       	MascDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      			MascDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       			MascDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascCaseN
+Nom+Sg:n      	MascDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:0       MascDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:i       MascDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:s       MascDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ar      MascDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:a       MascDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      MascDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       MascDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascCaseR
+Nom+Sg:ir      MascDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:i       MascDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:i       MascDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:is       MascDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ar      MascDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:a       MascDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      MascDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       MascDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascCase0
+Nom+Sg:0      MascDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:0       MascDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:i       MascDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:s       MascDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ar      MascDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:a       MascDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      MascDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       MascDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascCaseUr
+Nom+Sg:ur       			MascDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:0       			MascDefAccSg ;
@D.MASC.UR1@+Dat+Sg:@D.MASC.UR1@0       MascDefDatSg ;
@R.MASC.UR1@+Dat+Sg:@R.MASC.UR1@i	MascDefDatSg ;
@R.MASC.UR3@+Gen+Sg:@R.MASC.UR3@ar      MascDefGenSg ;
@D.MASC.UR3@+Gen+Sg:@D.MASC.UR3@s	MascDefGenSg ;

@D.MASC.UR1@+Nom+Pl:@D.MASC.UR1@ir      MascDefNomPl ;
@R.MASC.UR1@+Nom+Pl:@R.MASC.UR1@ar	MascDefNomPl ;
@D.MASC.UR1@+Acc+Pl:@D.MASC.UR1@i       MascDefAccPl ;
@R.MASC.UR1@+Acc+Pl:@R.MASC.UR1@a	MascDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      			MascDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       			MascDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascCaseL
+Nom+Sg:l      	MascDefNomSg ;
+Acc+Sg:0       MascDefAccSg ;
+Dat+Sg:i       MascDefDatSg ;
+Gen+Sg:s       MascDefGenSg ;

+Nom+Pl:ar      MascDefNomPl ;
+Acc+Pl:a       MascDefAccPl ;
+Dat+Pl:um      MascDefDatPl ;
+Gen+Pl:a       MascDefGenPl ;

LEXICON MascDefNomSg 
+Def:Inn	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefAccSg
+Def:Inn	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefDatSg
+Def:Inum	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefGenSg
+Def:Ins	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefNomPl
+Def:nir	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefAccPl
+Def:na		# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefDatPl
+Def:num	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON MascDefGenPl
+Def:nna	# ;
		# ;

LEXICON FemDefNomSg
+Def:In        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON FemDefAccSg
+Def:Ina        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON FemDefDatSg
+Def:Inni       # ;
                # ;

LEXICON FemDefGenSg
+Def:Innar        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON FemDefNomPl
+Def:nar        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON FemDefAccPl
+Def:nar         # ;
                 # ;

LEXICON FemDefDatPl
+Def:num        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON FemDefGenPl
+Def:nna        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefNomSg
+Def:Ið        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefAccSg
+Def:Ið        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefDatSg
+Def:Inu       # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefGenSg
+Def:Ins        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefNomPl
+Def:In        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefAccPl
+Def:In         # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefDatPl
+Def:num        # ;
                # ;

LEXICON NeuterDefGenPl
+Def:nna        # ;
                # ;


END
